District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.51

Scope of practice for asbestos workers.

For the purposes of this part, an “asbestos worker” is someone licensed under this subchapter and by the federal government to abate asbestos and asbestos materials as defined in subchapter VI of Chapter 1 of Title 8.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.51.